Hawaii statutes.
[§148-67] Seal
of quality special fund. (a) There is established in the state treasury
the seal of quality special fund, into which shall be deposited:

(1) All revenues from the
operations of the seal of quality program established under section 148-61;

(2) Fines collected under
section 148-66; and

(3) Any appropriations
made by the legislature to the fund.

(b) Moneys in the
special fund may be expended for all costs associated with the seal of quality
program, including:

(1) Conducting trade shows,
retail shows, conferences, seminars, and other promotional activities;

(2) Expenses for designs,
program labels, items and materials, displays, brochures, media advertisements,
inspection, and review and investigative activities relating to application and
enforcement of the program;

(3) Printing, mailing,
airfare and per diem, lei, decors, rental of facilities and audio visual
equipment, display and booth fees, participation fees, general supplies; and

(4) Any other expense
necessary to administer the program. [L 2007, c 120, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next